District of Columbia statutes.
42-1748

Repealed

Waiver of examination and education requirements for property managers.

Repealed.

Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-209, § 11a
as added Sept. 26, 1984, D.C. Law 5-117, § 2(i), 31 DCR 4023
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1233(l), 46 DCR 3142
1981 Ed., § 45-1930.1.